North Carolina, session 2025, HB1232.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article I of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"Sec. 39. Life begins at fertilization.
It is a matter of indisputable scientific fact that a distinct and separate human life begins at
the moment of fertilization. As such, that new human life is recognized by the State as an
individual person, entitled to the protection of the laws of this State from the moment of
fertilization until the moment of natural death. Any person who willfully seeks to destroy the life
of another person, by any means, at any stage of life, or succeeds in doing so, shall be held
accountable for attempted murder or for first degree murder, respectively. Any person has the
right to defend his or her own life or the life of another person, even by the use of deadly force
if necessary, from willful destruction by another person. The State has an interest and a duty to
defend innocent persons from willful destruction of their lives and to punish those who take the
lives of persons, born or unborn, who have not committed any crime punishable by death."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the general election in 2026, which election shall be conducted
under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots, voting systems, or both may be used
in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The question to be used in the voting
systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to recognize that a distinct and separate human life begins
at the moment of fertilization, and this individual person is entitled to the protection of the laws
of the State from the moment of fertilization until the moment of natural death."
SECTION 3. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1 of this act, the State Board of Elections shall certify the amendment to the
Secretary of State, and the amendment becomes effective January 1, 2027. The Secretary of State
shall enroll the amendment so certified among the permanent records of that office.
*H1232-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1232-First Edition